District of Columbia statutes.
29-1201.06

Rule of construction.

(a)

This chapter shall be liberally construed to give maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and to the enforceability of governing instruments.

(b)

The presumption that a civil statute in derogation of the common law is construed strictly shall not apply to this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 106 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Editor's Notes